Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska44-407.25
Life insurance; future premiums; benefits; approval of plan by department.

In the case of any plan of life insurance which provides for future premium determination, the amounts of which are to be determined by the insurance company based on then estimates of future experience, or in the case of any plan of life insurance which is of such a nature that minimum values cannot be determined by the methods described in sections 44-407.01 to 44-407.04, 44-407.08, 44-407.09, and 44-407.24, then:

(a) The Department of Insurance must be satisfied that the benefits provided under the plan are substantially as favorable to policyholders and insureds as the minimum benefits otherwise required by sections 44-407.01 to 44-407.04, 44-407.08, 44-407.09, and 44-407.24;

(b) The Department of Insurance must be satisfied that the benefits and the pattern of premiums of that plan are not such as to mislead prospective policyholders or insureds;

(c) The cash surrender values and paid-up nonforfeiture benefits provided by such plan must not be less than the minimum values and benefits required for the plan computed by a method consistent with the principles of the Standard Nonforfeiture Law for Life Insurance, as determined by regulations promulgated by the Department of Insurance;

(d) Notwithstanding any other provision in the laws of this state, any policy, contract, or certificate providing life insurance under any such plan must be affirmatively approved by the Department of Insurance before it can be marketed, issued, delivered, or used in this state.

Laws 1981, LB 355, § 12.